Utah statutes.
31A-7-202.   Members.
Sections 16-6a-601 and 16-6a-602 apply to members of corporations organized or
operating under this chapter.  Sections 16-6a-701, 16-6a-702, 16-6a-704,
16-6a-711, and 16-6a-712 apply to corporations organized or operating under
this chapter which have members.
